Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.52.050

Academic employee may appear in own behalf.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit any academic employee from appearing in his or her own behalf on matters relating to his or her employment relations with the college district.

[ 1991 c 238 s 149; 1971 ex.s. c 196 s 4.]